District of Columbia statutes.
8-103.13b

Fees, reimbursements, and costs.

(a)

The Mayor shall establish a schedule of fees for permits required by § 8-103.13a.

(b)

The Mayor may require reimbursement of costs for services including, inspections, sample collection, or document review pursuant to § 8-103.13a.

(c)

The Mayor may charge a fee for any permit issued pursuant to § 8-103.06.

History

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-188, § 14b
as added Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 612(e), 50 DCR 5668

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-103.01 and § 8-103.13a.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 612(e) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 612(e) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).